Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Division 3. Other Equipment

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Defective brakes: liability of owner or operator of motor vehicle for injury, death or property damage resulting from defective brakes, 40 ALR3d 9.

§ 31-5-950.
General braking requirements.

Every motor vehicle and every combination of vehicles shall have a service braking system which will stop the vehicle or combination within forty (40) feet from an initial speed of twenty (20) miles per hour on a level, dry, smooth, hard surface or within such shorter distance as may be specified by the superintendent.

Every motor vehicle and combination of vehicles excluding motorcycles, motor-driven cycles and mopeds shall have a parking brake system adequate to hold the vehicle or combination on any grade on which it is operated under all conditions of loading on a surface free from snow, ice or loose material or which shall comply with performance standards issued by the superintendent.

When necessary for safe operation, the superintendent may by regulation require additional braking systems.

The superintendent may adopt performance requirements for braking systems under this section. In formulating these requirements, the superintendent shall consider standards of the United States Department of Transportation, recommendations of other agencies and organizations, different classes of vehicles, deceleration rates, speeds, weather, loads, terrain and all other factors bearing on safe highway operations.

This section applies to motorcycles, motor-driven cycles, multipurpose vehicles and mopeds unless specifically excluded.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 133; C.S. 1945, § 60-733; W.S. 1957, § 31-202; Laws 1965, ch. 26, § 1; 1979, ch. 13, § 1; 1981, ch. 109, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1.

The 2008 amendment

, by Laws 2007, ch. 34, § 1 amends this section by inserting “, multipurpose vehicles” in (e).

Editor's notes. —

All of the following annotations were taken from cases decided prior to the 1984 revision of this title.

Emergency brake required on bus. —

It is clear that a foot or air brake on a bus is not sufficient to comply with this section. There must in addition to that be what is usually called an emergency brake. Rutz v. Anderson, 79 Wyo. 387, 334 P.2d 496,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1959).

And truck. —

A truck is required to have two separate sets of brakes, one of which is commonly called an emergency brake, to operate on the highway. Convoy Co. v. Dana, 359 P.2d 885,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1961).

Trucking company is negligent in using truck with defective emergency brake.

Convoy Co. v. Dana, 359 P.2d 885,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1961).

Even though truck not on highway at time of injury. —

The fact that a truck without the brake equipment required by this section is not on the highway at the time that someone is injured is not determinative of the trucking company's negligence under this section. Convoy Co. v. Dana, 359 P.2d 885,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1961).

More adequate provision for braking required than that fixed by section. —

See McClanahan v. Woodward Constr. Co., 77 Wyo. 362, 316 P.2d 337,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1957).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Negligence of driver of motor vehicle in regard to manner of timely application of proper brakes, 72 ALR2d 6.

Liability of owner or operator of automobile for injuries or property damage resulting from defective brakes, 40 ALR3d 9.

Failure to set brakes or to maintain adequate brakes as causing accidental runaway of parked motor vehicle, 42 ALR3d 1252.

§ 31-5-951.
Brakes on motor-driven cycles.

The superintendent may require an inspection of the braking system on any motor-driven cycle and disapprove any brake which in his opinion is not so designed or constructed as to insure reasonable and reliable performance in actual use.

The department may refuse to register or may suspend or revoke the registration of any motor-driven cycle when it is notified by the superintendent that the brake thereon does not comply with the provisions of this section.

No person shall operate on any highway any motor-driven cycle if the superintendent has disapproved the brake equipment upon that motor-driven cycle or type of motor-driven cycle.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 134; C.S. 1945, § 60-734; W.S. 1957, § 31-203; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to classification of motorized bicycles and scooters as motorcycles for purposes of registration, see § 31-1-101(a)(xv)(E).

As to registration generally, see §

31-2-201

.

§ 31-5-952.
Horns and warning devices.

Every motor vehicle when operated upon a highway shall be equipped with a horn in good working order and capable of emitting sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than two hundred (200) feet, but no horn or other warning device shall emit an unreasonably loud or harsh sound or a whistle. The driver of a motor vehicle shall when reasonably necessary to insure safe operation give audible warning with his horn but shall not otherwise use the horn when upon a highway.

No vehicle shall be equipped with nor shall any person use upon a vehicle any siren, whistle or bell, except as otherwise permitted in this section.

Any vehicle may be equipped with a theft alarm signal device which is so arranged that it cannot be used by the driver as an ordinary warning signal. The theft alarm signal device may use a whistle, bell, horn or other audible signal but shall not use a siren.

Every authorized emergency vehicle, except wreckers, shall be equipped with a siren, whistle or bell, capable of emitting sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet and of a type approved by the superintendent, but the siren shall not be used except when the vehicle is operated in response to an emergency call or in the immediate pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law, in which case the driver of the vehicle shall sound the siren when reasonably necessary to warn pedestrians and other drivers of the approach thereof.

This section applies to motorcycles, motor-driven cycles, multipurpose vehicles, mopeds and off-road recreational vehicles as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that are registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 135; C.S. 1945, § 60-735; W.S. 1957, § 31-204; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1; 2021 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

by Laws 2007, ch. 34, § 1 amends this section by inserting “multipurpose vehicles” in (e).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in (e), added "and off-road recreational vehicles as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that are registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

" and made a related change.

Failure of motorist passing bicyclist to sound horn. —

See Blakeman v. Gopp, 364 P.2d 986,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1961).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Motorist's liability for signaling other vehicle or pedestrian to proceed, or to pass signaling vehicle, 14 ALR5th 193.

§ 31-5-953.
Mufflers.

Every vehicle shall be equipped, maintained and operated so as to prevent excessive or unusual noise. Every motor vehicle shall at all times be equipped with a muffler or other effective noise suppressing system in good working order and in constant operation. No person shall use a muffler cut-out, bypass or similar device.

The engine and power mechanism of every motor vehicle shall be so equipped and adjusted as to prevent the escape of excessive fumes or smoke.

This section applies to motorcycles, motor-driven cycles, multipurpose vehicles, mopeds and off-road recreational vehicle as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that is registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 136; C.S. 1945, § 60-736; W.S. 1957, § 31-205; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1; 2021 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

by Laws 2007, ch. 34, § 1 amends this section by
inserting “multipurpose vehicles” in (c).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in (c), added "and off-road recreational vehicles as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that is registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

" and made a related change.

Cited

in

Cook v. United States, 346 F.2d 563, 1965 U.S. App. LEXIS 5489 (10th Cir. 1965).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Public regulations requiring mufflers or similar noise preventing devices on motor vehicles, 49 ALR2d 1202.

Products liability: motor vehicle exhaust systems, 72 ALR4th 62.

§ 31-5-954.
Mirrors.

On or before January 1, 1986, every motor vehicle including motorcycles, motor-driven cycles, multipurpose vehicles, mopeds and off-road recreational vehicles as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that are registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

shall be equipped with a mirror mounted on the left side of the vehicle and so located as to reflect to the driver a view of the highway to the rear of the vehicle.

Every motor vehicle except a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle or moped, shall be equipped with an additional mirror mounted either inside the vehicle approximately in the center or outside the vehicle on the right side and so located as to reflect to the driver a view of the highway to the rear of the vehicle.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 137; C.S. 1945, § 60-737; W.S. 1957, § 31-206; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1; 2021 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

by Laws 2007, ch. 34, § 1 amends this section by, inserting “multipurpose vehicles” in (a).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in (a), added "and off-road recreational vehicles as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that are registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

" and made a related change.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Operation of regulations requiring motor vehicles to be equipped with adequate mirrors, 27 ALR2d 1040.

§ 31-5-955.
Windshields and wipers.

No person shall drive any motor vehicle with any sign, poster or other material or substance upon or crack within the front windshield, side or rear windows of the vehicle which materially obstructs, obscures or impairs the driver’s clear view of the highway or any intersecting highway.

The windshield on every motor vehicle shall be equipped with a device for cleaning rain, snow or other moisture from the windshield, which device shall be so constructed as to be controlled or operated by the driver of the vehicle. This subsection shall apply to multipurpose vehicles as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(M) when equipped with a windshield and an enclosed cab.

Every motor vehicle shall be equipped with a windshield and a windshield wiper which shall be maintained in good working order.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 138; C.S. 1945, § 60-738; W.S. 1957, § 31-207; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

by Laws 2007, ch. 34, § 1 amends this section by inserting the last sentence in (b).

Warrantless traffic stop. —

District court properly concluded a stop of defendant’s vehicle was justified because, despite the stop of the vehicle being pretextual due to information that defendant might be transporting controlled substances, a trooper observed multiple cracks in the windshield on defendant’s vehicle, which could create impairment due to sun reflection, distortion, and damage to windshield wipers, where the trooper did not need to “determine that the driver’s view was impaired,” but only needed “reasonable suspicion” to suspect the driver’s view was obstructed, obscured, or impaired.
Simmons v. State, 2020 WY 132, 473 P.3d 1259,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2020).

Stated in

Allgier v. State, 2015 WY 137,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Oct.
23, 2015).

§ 31-5-956.
Tires; restriction of travel under hazardous conditions; penalties.

Every solid rubber tire on a vehicle shall have rubber on its entire traction surface at least one (1) inch thick above the edge of the flange of the entire periphery.

No person shall operate or move on any highway any motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer having any metal tire in contact with the roadway.

No tire on a vehicle moved on a highway shall have on its periphery any protuberance of any material other than rubber which projects beyond the tread of the traction surface of the tire, except that it shall be permissible to use:

Implements of husbandry with tires having protuberances which will not injure the highway;

Tire chains of reasonable proportions upon any vehicle when required for safety because of snow, ice or other conditions tending to cause a vehicle to skid;

Pneumatic tires having studs designed to improve traction without materially injuring the surface of the highway. Pneumatic tires having studs must be approved by the superintendent.

The superintendent and local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may issue special permits authorizing the operation upon a highway of tractors having movable tracks with transverse corrugations upon the periphery of the movable tracks or farm tractors or other farm machinery, the operation of which upon a highway would otherwise be prohibited under this section.

When the superintendent or his authorized representative determines that travel is sufficiently hazardous due to snow, ice or other conditions travel on a highway may be restricted to use only by motor vehicles utilizing adequate snow tires or tire chains, motor vehicles that are all-wheel drive vehicles or necessary emergency vehicles as defined in W.S. 31-5-102(a)(ii), including snow plows. The superintendent or his authorized representative may further restrict travel in extremely hazardous conditions to use only by necessary emergency vehicles as defined in W.S. 31-5-102(a)(ii), including snow plows, and those vehicles utilizing tire chains or to all-wheel drive vehicles utilizing adequate snow tires with a mud and snow or all-weather rating from the manufacturer having a tread of sufficient abrasive or skid-resistant design or composition and depth to provide adequate traction under existing driving conditions. The prohibition or restriction of use shall be effective when signs, including temporary or electronic signs, giving notice thereof are erected upon that portion of the highway, and it shall be unlawful to proceed in violation of the notice. The operator of a commercial vehicle shall affix tire chains to at least two (2) of the drive wheels of the vehicle at opposite ends of the same drive axle when the vehicle is required to utilize tire chains under this subsection. The state highway patrol shall cooperate with the department in the enforcement of any closing or restriction of use under this subsection.

A person shall not operate any vehicle when one (1) or more of the tires in use on that vehicle is in unsafe operating condition or has a tread depth less than four thirty-seconds (4/32) inch in the case of tires which are used on the front wheels of a bus, truck or truck tractor, or two thirty-seconds (2/32) inch in other cases, measured in any two (2) adjacent tread grooves at three (3) equally spaced intervals around the circumference of the tire but the measurements shall not be made at the location of any tread wear indicator, tie bar, hump or fillet. No vehicle shall be operated on any tire that has fabric exposed through the tread or sidewall.

A person in the business of selling tires shall not sell or offer for sale for highway use any tire which is in unsafe condition or which has a tread depth of less than two thirty-seconds (2/32) inch measured as specified in subsection (f) of this section.

This section applies to motorcycles, motor-driven cycles, multipurpose vehicles, mopeds and off-road recreational vehicles as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that are registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

.

Any person who operates a motor vehicle in violation of restrictions imposed by the department or the highway patrol under subsection (e) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be subject to a penalty of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00). Any person who operates a motor vehicle in violation of restrictions imposed by the department or the highway patrol under subsection (e) of this section, where the result of the violation is an incident that causes the closure of all lanes in one (1) or both directions of the highway, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be subject to a penalty of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

As used in this section, “tire chains” means metal chains which consist of two (2) circular metal loops, one (1) on each side of the tire, connected by not less than nine (9) evenly spaced chains across the tire tread and any other traction devices differing from metal chains in construction, material or design but capable of providing traction equal to or exceeding that of metal chains under similar conditions.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 139; C.S. 1945, § 60-739; W.S. 1957, § 31-208; Laws 1965, ch. 25, § 1; 1973, ch. 120, § 1; 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1; 2009, ch. 210, § 1; 2021 ch. 34, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to metal tires with projections, see §

31-12-101

.

The 2008 amendment,

by Laws 2007, ch. 34, § 1 amends this section by inserting “multipurpose vehicles” in (h).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (e) which read: “Travel on a highway may be restricted to all wheel drive vehicles or motor vehicles equipped with tire chains or adequate snow tires when the superintendent or his authorized representative determines that travel is sufficiently hazardous due to snow, ice or other conditions.”; and added (j) and (k).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in (h), added "and off-road recreational vehicles as defined by W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(K)(II) that are registered pursuant to W.S.

31-2-232

" and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed act.

§ 31-5-957.
Required flares, lanterns or reflectors for certain vehicles.

No person shall operate any truck more than eighty (80) inches in width, bus, truck-tractor or any motor vehicle towing a house trailer, upon any highway outside an urban district or upon any divided highway unless there is carried in the vehicle the following equipment except as provided in subsection (b) of this section:

At least three (3) flares or three (3) red electric lanterns or three (3) portable red emergency reflectors, each of which shall meet the requirements in SAE Standards J596 and J597 and Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 125. No flare, fusee, electric lantern or warning flag shall be used for the purpose of compliance with the requirements of this section unless the equipment is of a type which has been submitted to the superintendent and approved by him. No portable reflector unit shall be used for the purpose of compliance with the requirements of this section unless it is so designed and constructed as to be capable of reflecting red light clearly visible from all distances within six hundred (600) feet to one hundred (100) feet under normal atmospheric conditions at night when directly in front of lawful lower beams of head lamps and unless it is of a type which has been submitted to the superintendent and approved by him;

At least three (3) red-burning fusees unless red electric lanterns or red portable emergency reflectors are carried.

No person shall use or permit the use of any flame-producing emergency signal for protecting any vehicle transporting explosives, Class A or Class B, any cargo tank motor vehicle used for the transportation of any flammable liquid or flammable compressed gas, whether loaded or empty, or any motor vehicle using compressed gas as motor fuel. In lieu thereof, emergency reflective triangles, red electric lanterns or red emergency reflectors shall be used, the placement of which shall be in the same manner as prescribed in W.S.

31-5-958

.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 141; C.S. 1945, § 60-741; W.S. 1957, § 31-210; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-958

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to vehicular traffic hazard lamps, see §

31-5-923

.

§ 31-5-958.
Display of warning devices when vehicle disabled.

Whenever any truck, bus, truck tractor, trailer, semitrailer or pole trailer eighty (80) inches or more in overall width or thirty (30) feet in overall length is stopped upon a roadway or adjacent shoulder, the driver shall immediately actuate vehicular hazard warning signal lights meeting the requirements of W.S.

31-5-923

when warning signal lights are required by W.S.

31-5-923

. The lights need not be displayed by a vehicle parked lawfully in an urban district, or stopped lawfully to receive or discharge passengers, or stopped to avoid conflict with other traffic or to comply with the directions of a police officer or an official traffic-control device or while the devices specified in subsections (b) through (g) of this section are in place.

Whenever any vehicle of a type referred to in subsection (a) of this section is disabled, or stopped for more than ten (10) minutes, upon a roadway outside of an urban district at any time when lighted lamps are required, the driver of the vehicle shall display the following warning devices except as provided in subsection (c) of this section:

A lighted fusee, a lighted red electric lantern or a portable red emergency reflector shall be immediately placed at the traffic side of the vehicle in the direction of the nearest approaching traffic;

As soon thereafter as possible but in any event within the burning period of the fusee (ten (10) minutes), the driver shall place three (3) liquid-burning flares (pot torches), three (3) lighted red electric lanterns or three (3) portable red emergency reflectors on the roadway in the following order:

One (1) approximately one hundred (100) feet from the disabled vehicle in the center of the lane occupied by the vehicle and toward traffic approaching in that lane;

One (1) approximately one hundred (100) feet in the opposite direction from the disabled vehicle and in the center of the traffic lane occupied by the vehicle;

One (1) at the traffic side of the disabled vehicle not less than ten (10) feet rearward or forward thereof in the direction of the nearest approaching traffic. If a lighted red electric lantern or a red portable emergency reflector has been placed at the traffic side of the vehicle in accordance with paragraph (b)(i) of this section, it may be used for this purpose.

Whenever any vehicle referred to in this section is disabled, or stopped for more than ten (10) minutes, within five hundred (500) feet of a curve, hillcrest or other obstruction to view, the warning device in that direction shall be so placed as to afford ample warning to other users of the highway, but in no case less than one hundred (100) feet nor more than five hundred (500) feet from the disabled vehicle.

Whenever any vehicle of a type referred to in this section is disabled, or stopped for more than ten (10) minutes, upon any roadway of a divided highway during the time that lighted lamps are required, the appropriate warning devices prescribed in subsections (b) and (e) of this section shall be placed as follows:

One (1) at a distance of approximately two hundred (200) feet from the vehicle in the center of the lane occupied by the stopped vehicle and in the direction of traffic approaching in that lane;

One (1) at a distance of approximately one hundred (100) feet from the vehicle, in the center of the lane occupied by the vehicle and in the direction of traffic approaching in that lane;

One (1) at the traffic side of the vehicle and approximately ten (10) feet from the vehicle in the direction of the nearest approaching traffic.

Whenever any motor vehicle used in the transportation of explosives or any cargo tank truck used for the transportation of any flammable liquid or compressed flammable gas is disabled, or is stopped for more than ten (10) minutes, at any time or place mentioned in subsection (b), (c) or (d) of this section, the driver of the vehicle shall immediately display red electric lanterns or portable red emergency reflectors in the same number and manner specified therein. Flares, fusees or signals produced by flame shall not be used as warning devices for disabled vehicles of the type mentioned in this subsection nor for vehicles using compressed gas as a fuel.

The flares, fusees, red electric lanterns and portable red emergency reflectors to be displayed as required in this section shall conform with the requirements of W.S.

31-5-957

applicable thereto.

The warning devices described in subsections (b), (c), (d) and (e) of this section need not be displayed where there is sufficient light to reveal persons and vehicles within a distance of one thousand (1,000) feet.

When any vehicle described in this section is stopped entirely off the roadway and on an adjacent shoulder at any time and place described, the warning devices shall be placed, as nearly as practicable, on the shoulder near the edge of the roadway.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 142; C.S. 1945, § 60-742; W.S. 1957, § 31-211; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-959

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Driver is not “disabled” where his lane of travel is temporarily blocked,

and he merely awaits an opportunity to proceed forward. Reindal v. Casassa, 444 P.2d 321,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1968).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Negligence in failing to set out flares or lights or station person to warn of stationary motor vehicle on or adjacent to highway, 67 ALR2d 12.

§ 31-5-959.
Vehicles transporting hazardous materials.

Any person operating any vehicle transporting any hazardous materials, hazardous substance, hazardous waste, marine pollutant or radioactive material as a cargo or part of a cargo upon a highway shall at all times comply with regulations of the department adopted pursuant to W.S.

31-18-303

. The regulations shall be consistent with current hazardous materials regulations of the United States department of transportation.

No person shall dispose of or deposit any hazardous materials, hazardous substance, hazardous waste, marine pollutant or radioactive material upon any public street, road or highway in the state. However, the department of environmental quality or department of transportation may grant approval for the disposal or deposit of any material according to law.

Any person convicted of willfully violating subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both. Any person convicted of recklessly, as defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(ix), violating subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, or both. Any person convicted of criminal negligence, as defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(iii), in violating subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

As used in this section:

“Hazardous materials” means a substance or material, including a hazardous substance, which has been determined by the United States secretary of transportation under title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations to be capable of posing an unreasonable risk to health, safety and property and which has been so designated;

“Hazardous waste” means any material that is subject to the hazardous waste manifest requirements of the United States environmental protection agency as specified in 40 C.F.R. part 262;

“Marine pollutant” means a hazardous substance which is listed in appendix B, 49 C.F.R. part 172.101 and, when in a solution or mixture of one (1) or more marine pollutants, is packaged in a concentration which equals or exceeds:

Ten percent (10%) by weight of the solution or mixture for materials that are listed in the appendix;

One percent (1%) by weight of the solution or mixture for materials that are identified as severe marine pollutants in the appendix.

“Radioactive material” means any material having a specific activity greater than 0.002 microcuries per gram;

“Specific activity” of a radionuclide means the activity of the radionuclide per unit mass of that nuclide. The specific activity of a material in which the radionuclide is essentially uniformly distributed is the activity per unit mass of the material.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 143; C.S. 1945, § 60-743; W.S. 1957, § 31-212; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-960

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1995, ch. 29, § 1; 2009, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “6-1-104(a)(iii)” for “6-4-104(a)(iii)” in (c).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

State or local regulation of transportation of hazardous materials as pre-empted by Hazardous Materials Transportation Act (49 USC § 1801 et seq.) [ 49 USC § 5101 et seq.], 78 ALR Fed 289.

Quoted

in

V-1 Oil Co. v. Means, 94 F.3d 1420, 1996 U.S. App. LEXIS 21933 (10th Cir. 1996).

§ 31-5-960.
Pedestrian vehicles.

Every pedestrian vehicle operated upon a highway shall be equipped with the following equipment:

A horn meeting the requirements of W.S. 31-5-952(a);

At least one (1) headlamp of either a single-beam or multiple-beam type which shall be of sufficient intensity to reveal a person or a vehicle at a distance of not less than one hundred (100) feet when operated at any speed less than twenty-five (25) miles per hour;

Two (2) tail lamps which shall be so wired as to be lighted whenever the headlamp is lighted and which, when lighted, shall emit a red light plainly visible from a distance of at least one hundred (100) feet to the rear;

Rear stop lamps and turn signals conforming to the requirements of the superintendent;

A brake which conforms to the performance requirements of W.S.

31-5-951

; and

A reflectorized flag mounted in a bracket permanently affixed to the vehicle. The flag, when mounted, shall be visible from all directions at a height of not less than forty-eight (48) inches nor more than seventy-two (72) inches measured from the level ground upon which the vehicle stands and shall conform to the following requirements:

Be constructed of durable, all-weather type material;

Be orange in color;

Be triangular in shape with a minimum base length of eight and one-half (8 1/2) inches and a minimum side length of eleven and one-half (11 1/2) inches.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 89, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-961

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-5-961.
Television receivers; electronic displays.

No motor vehicle operated on Wyoming highways shall be equipped with television-type receiving equipment so located that the viewer or screen is visible from the driver’s seat.

This section does not prohibit the use of television-type receiving equipment used exclusively for safety or law enforcement purposes, provided the use is approved by the highway department.

This section does not prohibit the use of electronic displays used in conjunction with vehicle navigation systems.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1995, ch. 133, § 1.

§ 31-5-962.
Sunscreening devices.

As used in this section:

“Dealer” means any person or business engaged in the distribution or installation of sunscreening products or materials designed to be used in conjunction with vehicle glazing materials for the purpose of reducing the effects of the sun;

“Light transmission” means the ratio of the amount of total light to pass through a product or material to the amount of the total light falling on the product or material;

“Luminous reflectance” means the ratio of the amount of total light that is reflected outward by the product or material to the amount of the total light falling on the product or materials;

“Multipurpose passenger vehicle” means a motor vehicle designed to carry ten (10) persons or less which is constructed either on a truck chassis or with special features for occasional off-road operation;

“Nonreflective” means a product or material designed to absorb light rather than to reflect it;

“Sunscreening device” means film material or device that is designed to be used in conjunction with motor vehicle safety glazing materials for reducing the effects of the sun.

No person may operate an enclosed motor vehicle that is registered or required to be registered in this state on any public highway, road or street that has a sunscreen device on the windshield, the front side wings and side windows adjacent to the right and left of the driver and windows adjacent to the rear of the driver that do not meet the requirements of this section.

A sunscreening device when used in conjunction with the windshield shall be a nonreflective type and may not be red, yellow or amber in color. A sunscreening device may be used only along the top of the windshield and may not extend downward beyond the AS-1 line or more than five (5) inches from the top of the windshield, whichever is closer to the top of the windshield.

A sunscreening device, when used in conjunction with the safety glazing materials of the side wings or side windows, or both, located at the immediate right and left of the driver, shall be a nonreflective type and have total light transmission through both the sunscreening device and glazing of not less than twenty-eight percent (28%).

A sunscreening device, when used in conjunction with the safety glazing materials of the side windows behind the driver and the rearmost window, shall be a nonreflective type and have total light transmission through both the sunscreening device and glazing of not less than twenty-eight percent (28%).

No sunscreening device or tinting film may be applied or affixed to any window of a motor vehicle that has a luminous reflectance of light exceeding twenty percent (20%).

If any sunscreen device or tinting film is added to any windows behind the operator, one (1) left and one (1) right outside rearview mirror shall be required.

The requirements of this section shall not apply to windows behind the driver of trucks, buses, motor homes, ambulances, limousines and multipurpose passenger vehicles, to windshields on motorcycles or motor-driven cycles. Except as provided in subsection (j) of this section, vehicle windows with a sunscreen device or tinting film applied prior to July 1, 1996 which do not meet the specifications established by this section shall be in violation after December 31, 1996.

Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (d) and (e) of this section, any sunscreening device applied prior to July 1, 1996, when used in conjunction with the safety glazing materials of the side wings or side windows located at the immediate right and left of the driver, the side windows behind the driver and the rearmost window shall be of a nonreflective type and have total light transmission through both the sunscreening device and the glazing of not less than thirteen percent (13%).

No person or firm may apply or affix to the windows of any motor vehicle in this state, a sunscreen device or tinting film that is not in compliance with the requirements of this section.

Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, a motor vehicle operated by or regularly used to transport any person with a medical condition which renders him susceptible to harm or injury from exposure to sunlight or bright artificial light may be equipped, on its windshield and any or all of its windows, with sun shading or tinting films or applications which reduce the transmission of light into the vehicle to levels not less than twenty-five percent (25%). The sun shading or tinting film when applied to the windshield of a motor vehicle shall not cause the total light transmittance to be reduced to any level less than seventy percent (70%), except for the upper five (5) inches of the windshield or the AS-1 line, whichever is closer to the top of the windshield. Vehicles equipped with sun shading or tinting films as provided in this subsection shall not be operated on any highway unless the driver or an occupant of the vehicle has in his possession a certificate issued by the director authorizing such operation. The director shall issue the certificate only upon receipt of a signed statement from a licensed physician or licensed optometrist identifying the person seeking the certificate and stating that, in the physician’s or optometrist’s professional opinion, the equipping of a vehicle with sun shading or tinting films or applications is necessary to safeguard the health of the person seeking the certificate. Certificates issued by the director under this subsection shall be valid so long as the condition requiring the use of sun shading or tinting films or applications persists or until the vehicle is sold, whichever first occurs. In the discretion of the director, one (1) or more certificates may be issued to an individual or a family.

This section shall apply to multipurpose vehicles as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(M) when equipped with a windshield and an enclosed cab.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 44, § 1; 1997, ch. 115, § 1; 2007, ch. 34, § 1.

Amendment effective January 1, 2008. —

Laws 2007, ch. 34, § 1, amends this section by adding (n).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.